Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-229
Constitutional convention; delegates; election; ballots; printing; distribution.

The ballots for delegates to the constitutional convention shall be printed and distributed in the same manner as ballots for members of the Legislature in the primary election.

Laws 1953, c. 173, § 18, p. 553.